California, session 20252026, AB1093.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 99110) is added to Part 65 of Division 14 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: CHAPTER 2.3. California-Mexico Higher Education Academic Exchange Programs99110. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The California-Mexico region is composed of 170,000,000 residents and represents the 5th and 12th largest economies of the world, respectively.(2) There are very few policies or a long-term plan to remain as one of the most productive and competitive megaregions. (3) A most critical issue is the almost nonexistent higher education exchange of students, faculty, researchers, and policymakers in the California-Mexico megaregion, despite the prime financial relationship that binds them as each other’s top economic partner.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to strengthen educational exchanges between students from California and Mexico.99111.For purposes of this section, “California public universities” means the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and their respective campuses.99112.(a)Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, the California State University and each community college district shall, and the University of California is requested to, do both of the following:(1)Adopt a plan to increase the number of students participating in exchange programs with universities in Mexico. The plan shall identify existing exchange programs at California public universities consistent with the requirements of this chapter.(2)Make every effort to increase the number of students attending Mexican universities who participate in exchange programs with California public universities.(b)(1)The California State University shall have an exchange program with at least one Mexican public university at a minimum of 10 of the California State University campuses by January 31, 2027, and every effort shall be made to ensure that exchange programs with at least one Mexican public university are available to students at all of the California State University’s campuses by January 1, 2029.(2)The office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall facilitate the distribution of sample educational materials for the exchange programs and coordinate outreach for purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, outreach with student services programs.(c)Each community college district shall make every effort to have an exchange program with at least one Mexican public university at a minimum of one of the community college district’s campuses by January 1, 2029.(d)It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California have an exchange program with at least one Mexican public university at each of the University of California’s campuses.99113.(a)Notwithstanding any other law, a California public university may enter into a tuition reciprocity agreement with universities participating in an exchange program.(b)The California public universities may accept contributions from private sources, including private for-profit and nonprofit organizations, for the purpose of supporting exchange programs.(c)The California State University and each community college district shall not, and the University of California is requested to not, impose a matching fund requirement by Mexico as a condition of implementing an exchange program pursuant to this chapter.99111. Commencing with the 2027–28 academic year, the California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, adopt a plan to increase the number of students participating in exchange programs with Mexican public universities. The plan shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(a) A description of existing exchange programs and institutional partnerships with Mexican public universities.(b) Strategies to increase student participation in exchange opportunities, including, but not limited to, expanding student access to or establishing exchange programs.(c) Goals for expanding institutional partnerships with Mexican public universities.(d) Outreach and student support activities designed to promote participation.(e) Strategies to facilitate ongoing communication and collaboration among campuses within their respective systems, including, but not limited to, the sharing of resources, grant funding opportunities, best practices, and knowledge on exchange programs.99114.99112. This chapter shall become operative only upon an appropriation of funds for its purposes.SEC. 2.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.